Utah statutes.
63G-7-702.   Payment of claim or judgment against political subdivision --
Procedure by governing body -- Payment options.
(1) (a)  Each claim approved by a political subdivision or any final judgment
obtained against a political subdivision shall be submitted to the governing
body of the political subdivision.
(b)  The governing body shall pay the claim immediately from the general funds
of the political subdivision unless:
(i)  the funds are appropriated to some other use or restricted by law or
contract for other purposes; or
(ii)  the political subdivision opts to pay the claim or award in installments
under Subsection (2).
(2)  If the subdivision is unable to pay the claim or award during the current
fiscal year, it may pay the claim or award in not more than ten ensuing annual
installments of equal size or in whatever other installments that are
agreeable to the claimant.
